Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2621
Program; Board of Regents; administer; rules and regulations; adopt; reports; conditions.

The program established by section 38-2620 shall be administered by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska. The Board of Regents shall adopt appropriate rules and regulations to carry out sections 38-2620 to 38-2623 and negotiate contract arrangements with accredited schools and colleges of optometry, as provided in section 38-2616, for the admission and education of qualified applicants who are citizens of Nebraska and who have demonstrated their interest, aptitude, and readiness for study in the field of optometry. The Board of Regents shall require reports each year from institutions receiving payments showing the progress and suitability of each student being aided and containing such other information as such board deems proper.

Laws 1974, LB 911, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,136.06;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 894.